District of Columbia statutes.
1-301.122

Authority to participate in multistate negotiations.

(a)

For the purposes of reviewing or amending the Agreement embodying the simplification requirements as contained in § 1-301.125, the District of Columbia shall enter into multistate discussions. For purposes of the discussions, the District of Columbia shall be represented by 4 delegates.

(b)

The Mayor shall appoint one delegate to serve at the pleasure of the Mayor.

(c)

The Chairman of the Council shall appoint one delegate to serve at the pleasure of the Chairman of the Council.

(d)

The Chief Financial Officer of the District of Columbia (“Chief Financial Officer”) shall appoint one delegate to serve at the pleasure of the Chief Financial Officer.

(e)

The Council on State Taxation shall appoint one tax counsel to serve as a delegate of the District of Columbia. The Council on State Taxation shall notify the Mayor and the Chairman of the Council of the appointment by registered mail.

History

June 25, 2002, D.C. Law 14-156, § 3, 49 DCR 4272
Mar. 13, 2004, D.C. Law 15-105, § 16, 51 DCR 881

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 15-105, in subsec. (a), validated a previously made technical correction.